Hawaii statutes.
§329B-5 Substance abuse testing procedures
and interpretation of test results. (a) Prior to the collection of any
sample for substance abuse testing, the individual to be tested shall receive a
written statement of the specific substances to be tested for and a statement
that over-the-counter medications or prescribed drugs may result in a positive
test result.

(b) In accordance with this section, the
director shall adopt rules pertaining to:

(1) The qualifications, responsibilities, and
licensing of the medical review officer;

(2) The method of transmittal of laboratory test
results and any interpretations of test results to the third party and the
tested individual; and

(3) The obtaining, disclosure, and confidentiality of
substance abuse testing information.

(c) No laboratory, including a substance abuse
on-site screening location, may test for any substance not included on the
written statement containing the specific substances to be tested for.

(d) As used in this section, "test
results" means laboratory test results or the results of substance abuse
on-site screening tests. [L 1990, c 236, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 206, §5; am L
2001, c 53, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next